Utah statutes.
40-6-17.   Cooperative research and development projects.

The board and the Division of Oil, Gas, and Mining are authorized to enter into cooperative agreements with the national, state or local governments, and with independent organizations and institutions for the purpose of carrying out research and development experiments involving energy resources to the extent that the project is funded or partially funded and approved by the Legislature.

